Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2101
Nebraska Rural Rehabilitation Corporation; dissolved; acceptance of federal law.

The State of Nebraska hereby accepts the provisions of Public Law 499, enacted by the Eighty-first Congress of the United States, and entitled An Act to provide for the liquidation of the trusts under the transfer agreements with the state rural rehabilitation corporations, and for other purposes. In connection with such acceptance, the State of Nebraska finds and declares that the Nebraska Rural Rehabilitation Corporation has been dissolved.

Laws 1951, c. 4, § 1, p. 64.